Hawaii statutes.
§321-226 Emergency medical services and
systems, standards. The department of health shall establish standards for
emergency medical services and for emergency medical service systems consistent
with the state system and applicable federal guidelines for such services,
including a requirement that ambulance service providers licensed by the State
establish and maintain an alcohol and substance abuse policy for employees that
the department of health deems is equivalent to, or exceeds the provisions of,
the safety and health standards established by the federal Department of
Transportation for holders of commercial driver's licenses. In the event the
standards are determined or regulated by any other law, or by applicable
federal guidelines, standards required to be set by this section shall be at
least equivalent to or exceed the other state and federal standards. [L 1978, c
148, pt of §1; am L 2003, c 106, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next